Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-2448
Prescription
medication distribution machine; requirements; location.

A prescription medication distribution machine:

(1) Is subject to the requirements of section 71-2447 and, if it is in a long-term care automated
pharmacy, is subject to section 71-2451; and

(2) May be operated only (a) in
a licensed pharmacy where a pharmacist dispenses medications to patients for
self-administration pursuant to a prescription or (b) in a long-term care automated pharmacy subject to
section 71-2451.

Laws 2008, LB308, § 5;

Laws 2013, LB326, § 7.
September 6, 2013